New Jersey, session 222, S531.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   A taxpayer who has paid one-half or more of the costs of tuition and maintenance of a dependent under the age of 22 years in attendance at a New Jersey county college shall be allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due pursuant to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., in an amount equal to the amount of the costs of tuition and maintenance paid up to a maximum credit of $750 for a dependent in attendance on a full-time basis and in an amount equal to one-half of the amount of the costs of tuition and maintenance paid up to a maximum credit of $375 for a dependent in attendance on a part-time basis having completed at least six credits per semester.  No credit shall be allowed under this subsection for a taxable year if the taxpayer has claimed a deduction for the dependent pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1976, c.84 (C.54A:3-1.1) for that taxable year. b.    A taxpayer who has paid costs of tuition and maintenance for the taxpayer's attendance at a New Jersey county college shall be allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due pursuant to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., in an amount equal to the amount of the costs of tuition and maintenance paid up to a maximum credit of $750 for the taxpayer's attendance on a full time basis and in an amount equal to one-half of the amount of the costs of tuition and maintenance paid up to a maximum credit of $375 for the taxpayer's attendance on a part-time basis having completed at least six credits per semester.  No credit shall be allowed under this subsection for a taxable year if the taxpayer in attendance at a county college is a dependent of another taxpayer who claims a credit for the taxpayer in attendance at a county college under subsection a. of this section for that taxable year. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 next following the date of enactment.